Massachusetts, session 194th, S1924.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 64J of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Tax per gallon”, and replacing it with the
following definition:- “Tax per gallon”, an amount in cents per gallon equivalent to the amount
in cents per gallon of the tax levied on sales of fuel, other than aviation fuel, set pursuant to
section 1 of chapter 64A.
of 1